Utah statutes.
78A-6-801.   Purpose.

(1)  The purpose of this part is to provide a means by which a minor who has demonstrated the ability and capacity to manage his or her own affairs and to live independent of his or her parents or guardian, may obtain the legal status of an emancipated person with the power to enter into valid legal contracts.

(2)  This part is not intended to interfere with the integrity of the family or to minimize the rights of parents or children.  As provided in Section 62A-4a-201, a parent possesses a fundamental liberty interest in the care, custody, and management of their children.

